Utah statutes.
16-6a-1504.   Amended application for authority to conduct affairs.

(1)  A foreign nonprofit corporation authorized to conduct affairs in this state shall deliver an amended application for authority to conduct affairs to the division for filing if the foreign nonprofit corporation changes:

(a)  its corporate name;

(b)  its assumed corporate name;

(c)  the period of its duration;

(d)  the state or country of its incorporation; or

(e)  any of the information required by Subsection 16-17-203(1).

(2)  The requirements of Section 16-6a-1503 for filing an original application for authority to conduct affairs apply to filing an amended application for authority to conduct affairs under this section.

